Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2228.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-245, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-245. Mandatory reporting training; materials A. The Arizona prosecuting attorneys' advisory council shall develop a statewide training curriculum on the mandatory reporting laws of this state, including section 13-3620, for public school personnel. Each public school shall require its personnel to complete the training developed pursuant to this section. B. The Arizona prosecuting attorneys' advisory council shall develop a statewide training curriculum on the mandatory reporting laws of this state, including section 46-454, and shall make the training curriculum available to persons who are required to report pursuant to section 46-454. B. C. The department of education shall provide resources and materials developed pursuant to this section that schools may use for the purposes of providing information on the mandatory reporting laws of this state, including section 13-3620, to parents and students. C. D. The department shall make the training curriculum and materials developed pursuant to this section available to public and private schools. This section does not require private schools to offer the training developed pursuant to this section. END_STATUTESec. 2. Section 46-457, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE46-457. Elder abuse central registry; mandatory reporting; release of information A. A person who files an action under this article shall serve notice and one copy of the pleading with the attorney general within thirty days after the action is filed in the superior court. The notice shall identify the action, the person against whom the civil complaint has been filed and that person's attorney. The person who files an action is responsible for submitting shall submit a report on to the attorney general not more than two years after the initial notice is submitted to the attorney general that indicates whether the action is ongoing and shall submit a report that provides the final disposition of the case within thirty days after the final action is taken. B. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a state agency other than adult protective services that renders an administrative decision that substantiates the allegation of abuse or that files a civil action that alleges abuse, neglect or financial exploitation pursuant to this article or title 36 shall serve notice and one copy of the administrative decision or pleading with the attorney general within thirty days after the administrative decision is rendered or within thirty days after the action is filed in the superior court. The agency is responsible for submitting shall submit a report on the final disposition of the case within thirty days after the final action is taken.  Adult protective services shall report its findings to the registry established pursuant to section 46-459.  The department of economic security shall not provide the notice prescribed in this subsection for information maintained in the adult protective services registry pursuant to section 46-459. C. If the victim of the offense is a vulnerable adult, a person who files a criminal complaint or indictment involving a violation of this article or section 13-1102, 13-1103, 13-1104, 13-1105, 13-1201, 13-1203, 13-1204, 13-1303, 13-1304, 13-1403, 13-1404, 13-1406, 13-1802, 13-1807, 13-2002, 13-2310 or 13-3623 shall submit a copy of the criminal complaint or indictment to the attorney general within thirty days after arraignment. Within thirty days of after the date of issuance of the minute entry the court shall endorse to the attorney general a copy of the sentencing minute entry or the minute entry reflecting the case has been dismissed or a judgment of acquittal has been entered. The attorney general shall develop guidelines to implement this subsection. D. The attorney general shall maintain a registry containing the names of persons pursuant to subsection A, B or C of this section with the date the action was filed with the superior court or the date the administrative decision was rendered, the dates of the conduct set forth in the complaint, the indictment or decision, the general nature of the complaint, indictment or decision and the disposition of the complaint, indictment or decision, if known. If a report on the status and disposition of an action is not submitted pursuant to subsection A, B or C of this section, the attorney general shall either: 1. If the attorney general is able to determine the status or disposition of the action, update the registry. 2. If the attorney general is unable to determine the status or disposition of the action, delete the information from the registry. E. The information maintained pursuant to subsection D of this section is available to the public on written request to the custodian of the registry. F. A person may submit a written statement on that person's own behalf to the custodian of the registry. The statement is part of the records for distribution in response to all inquiries concerning that person. G. A person or agency that distributes information in the registry in good faith is not subject to civil or criminal liability. END_STATUTE